District of Columbia statutes.
31-2301

Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Domestication” means the reorganization under this chapter of the United States branch of a Non-U.S. insurer whereby a domestic or foreign insurer acquires all the business and assets and assumes all the liabilities of the branch.

(2)

“Domestic insurer” means a stock insurance company incorporated under the laws of the District of Columbia.

(3)

“Foreign insurer” means a stock insurance company incorporated under the laws of any other state of the United States.

(4)

“Non-U.S. insurer” means a stock insurance company organized under the laws of a foreign country.

(5)

“United States branch” means the business unit through which business is transacted within the United States by a Non-U.S. insurer and the assets and liabilities of the insurer within the United States pertaining to such business.

Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-194, § 2, 47 DCR 7427